Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.310

Change of location.

An alien bank licensed to maintain an office or bureau in this state pursuant to this chapter may apply to the director for leave to change the location of its office or bureau. Such applications shall be accompanied by an investigation fee as established in accordance with RCW 30A.42.330. Leave for a change of location shall be granted if the director finds that the proposed new location offers reasonable promise of adequate support for the office.

[ 2014 c 37 s 221; 1994 c 92 s 101; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 31. Formerly RCW 30.42.310.]